Utah statutes.
16-16-808.   Suspension of director by board.

(1)  A board of directors may suspend a director if, considering the director's course of conduct and the inadequacy of other available remedies, immediate suspension is necessary for the best interests of the association and the director is engaging, or has engaged, in:

(a)  fraudulent conduct with respect to the association or its members;

(b)  gross abuse of the position of director;

(c)  intentional or reckless infliction of harm on the association; or

(d)  any other behavior, act, or omission as provided by the organic rules.

(2)  A suspension under Subsection (1) is effective for 30 days unless the board of directors calls and gives notice of a special meeting of members for removal of the director before the end of the 30-day period in which case the suspension is effective until adjournment of the meeting or the director is removed.



Enacted by Chapter 363, 2008 General Session

